Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB692.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 367.3611 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629:
(1) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another legal
entity or shares common branding with another legal entity. For the purposes of this definition, "control" or
"controlled" means:
(a) Ownership of, or the power to vote, more than fifty percent (50%) of the outstanding shares of any class
of voting security of a company;
(b) Control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals exercising
similar functions; or
(c) The power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company;
(2) "Authenticate" means verifying through reasonable means that the consumer entitled to exercise his or her
consumer rights in KRS 367.3615 is the same consumer exercising such consumer rights with respect to the
personal data at issue;
(3) "Automatic content recognition data":
(a) Means data about a consumer's content viewing history collected through the use of technology that
is embedded or operated through a smart television or smart monitor, integrated with internet
connectivity and an operating system that identifies, in real time, the specific content displayed by
analyzing audio or video fingerprints, including but not limited to content received through
broadcast, cable, satellite, streaming services, or external inputs, through digital fingerprinting,
watermark detection, or similar comparison techniques; and
(b) Does not include data:
1. Collected about a consumer's interactions with content provided by the controller's own
services;
2. Generated in the course of providing a feature or service requested by a consumer; or
3. Collected for the purpose of enforcing terms of service;
(4) "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's biological
characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or other unique biological patterns or
characteristics that are used to identify a specific individual. Biometric data does not include a physical or
digital photograph, a video or audio recording, or data generated therefrom, unless that data is generated to
identify a specific individual or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or
operations under HIPAA;
(5)[(4)] "Business associate" has the same meaning as established in 45 C.F.R. sec. 160.103 pursuant to
HIPAA;
(6)[(5)] "Child" has the same meaning as in 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501;
(7)[(6)] "Consent" means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's freely given, specific, informed, and
unambiguous agreement to process personal data relating to the consumer. Consent may include a written
statement, written by electronic means or any other unambiguous affirmative action;
(8)[(7)] "Consumer" means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky acting only in
an individual context. Consumer does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or employment
context;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(9)[(8)] "Controller" means the natural or legal person that, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose
and means of processing personal data;
(10)[(9)] "Covered entity" has the same meaning as established in 45 C.F.R. sec. 160.103 pursuant to HIPAA;
(11)[(10)] "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer" means a decision
made by a controller that results in the provision or denial by the controller of financial and lending services,
housing, insurance, education enrollment, criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or
access to basic necessities like food and water;
(12)[(11)] "De-identified data" means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an identified or identifiable natural
person or a device linked to a person;
(13)[(12)] "Fund" means the consumer privacy fund established in KRS 367.3629;
(14)[(13)] "Health care provider" means:
(a) Any health facility as defined in KRS 216B.015;
(b) Any person or entity providing health care or health services, including those licensed, certified, or
registered under, or subject to, KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 or KRS Chapter 310, 311, 311A, 311B,
312, 313, 314, 314A, 315, 319, 319A, 319B, 319C, 320, 327, 333, 334A, or 335;
(c) The current and former employers, officers, directors, administrators, agents, or employees of those
entities listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Any person acting within the course and scope of his or her office, employment, or agency relating to a
health care provider;
(15)[(14)] "Health record" means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes, relating to an individual,
kept by a health care provider as a result of the professional relationship established between the health care
provider and the individual;
(16)[(15)] "HIPAA" means the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No.
104-191;
(17)[(16)] "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a person who can be readily identified directly or
indirectly;
(18)[(17)] "Institution of higher education" means an educational institution which:
(a) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school or the
recognized equivalent of such a certificate;
(b) Is legally authorized in this state to provide a program of education beyond high school;
(c) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree, or provides a
program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of postgraduate or
postdoctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a
recognized occupation; and
(d) Is a public or other nonprofit institution;
(19)[(18)] "Nonprofit organization" means any incorporated or unincorporated entity that:
(a) Is operating for religious, charitable, or educational purposes; and
(b) Does not provide net earnings to, or operate in any manner that inures to the benefit of, any officer,
employee, or shareholder of the entity;
(20)[(19)] "Personal data" means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
identifiable natural person. Personal data does not include de-identified data or publicly available information;
(21)[(20)] "Precise geolocation data" means information derived from technology, including but not limited to
global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies
the specific location of a natural person with precision and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven
hundred fifty (1,750) feet. Precise geolocation data does not include the content of communications or any data
generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility;

CHAPTER 118 3
(22)[(21)] "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or
automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, including but not limited to the collection, use,
storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion, or modification of personal data;
(23)[(22)] "Processor" means a natural or legal entity that processes personal data on behalf of a controller;
(24)[(23)] "Profiling" means any form of automated processing performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze,
or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural person's economic situation, health,
personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements;
(25)[(24)] "Protected health information" means the same as established in 45 C.F.R. sec. 160.103 pursuant to
HIPAA;
(26)[(25)] "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be attributed to a specific natural person without
the use of additional information, provided that the additional information is kept separately and is subject to
appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to an
identified or identifiable natural person;
(27)[(26)] "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal,
state, or local government records, or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully
made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by the consumer, or by a person to
whom the consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted the information to a
specific audience;
(28)[(27)] "Sale of personal data" means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration by the
controller to a third party. Sale of personal data does not include:
(a) The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on behalf of the
controller;
(b) The disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service requested
by the consumer;
(c) The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;
(d) The disclosure of information that the consumer:
1. Intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media; and
2. Did not restrict to a specific audience; or
(e) The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an asset that is part of a proposed or actual
merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or
part of the controller's assets;
(29)[(28)] "Sensitive data" means a category of personal data that includes:
(a) Personal data indicating racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or physical health diagnosis,
sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration status;
(b) The processing of genetic or biometric data that is processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying a
specific natural person;
(c) The personal data collected from a known child; or
(d) Precise geolocation data;
(30) "Smart monitor":
(a) Means a digital, display device that integrates hardware and software components to enable:
1. Internet connectivity;
2. Application execution; and
3. Media content streaming independently of an external computer or media source; and
(b) Does not include a voice assistant device or mobile device;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(31)[(29)] "State agency" means all departments, offices, commissions, boards, institutions, and political and
corporate bodies of the state, including the offices of the clerk of the Supreme Court, clerks of the appellate
courts, the several courts of the state, and the legislature, its committees, or commissions;
(32)[(30)] "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is
selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer's activities over time and across
nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict that consumer's preferences or interests. "Targeted
advertising" does not include:
(a) Advertisements based on activities within a controller's own or affiliated websites or online
applications;
(b) Advertisements based on the context of a consumer's current search query, visit to a website, or online
application;
(c) Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer's request for information or
feedback; or
(d) Processing personal data solely for measuring or reporting advertising performance, reach, or
frequency;
(33)[(31)] "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency, or body other than the
consumer, controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the controller; and
(34)[(32)] "Trade secret" has the same meaning as in KRS 365.880.
Section 2. KRS 367.3617 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A controller shall:
(a) Limit the collection of personal data to what is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation
to the purposes for which the data is processed as disclosed to the consumer;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, not process personal data for purposes that are neither
reasonably necessary to nor compatible with the disclosed purposes for which the personal data is
processed as disclosed to the consumer, unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent;
(c) Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data security
practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of personal data. The data security
practices shall be appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue;
(d) Not process personal data in violation of state and federal laws that prohibit unlawful discrimination
against consumers. A controller shall not discriminate against a consumer for exercising any of the
consumer rights contained in KRS 367.3615, including denying goods or services, charging different
prices or rates for goods or services, or providing a different level of quality of goods and services to
the consumer. However, nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require a controller to provide a
product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or
maintain, or to prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of
goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if the offer is related to
a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, or
club card program;[ and]
(e) Not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without obtaining the consumer's consent, or, in the
case of the processing of sensitive data collected from a known child, process the data in accordance
with the federal Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501 et seq.; and
(f) Not collect automatic content recognition data without a consumer's consent.
(2) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or limit in any way consumer
rights pursuant to KRS 367.3615 shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and
unenforceable.
(3) Controllers shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful privacy notice that
includes:
(a) The categories of personal data processed by the controller;
(b) The purpose for processing personal data;

CHAPTER 118 5
(c) How consumers may exercise their consumer rights pursuant to KRS 367.3615, including how a
consumer may appeal a controller's decision with regard to the consumer's request;
(d) The categories of personal data that the controller shares with third parties, if any; and
(e) The categories of third parties, if any, with whom the controller shares personal data.
(4) If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal data for targeted advertising, the
controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such activity, as well as the manner in which a consumer
may exercise the right to opt out of processing.
(5) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice, one (1) or more secure and reliable means
for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer rights under KRS 367.3615. The different ways
to submit a request by a consumer shall take into account the ways in which consumers normally interact with
the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of such requests, and the ability of the controller
to authenticate the identity of the consumer making the request. Controllers shall not require a consumer to
create a new account in order to exercise consumer rights pursuant to KRS 367.3615 but may require a
consumer to use an existing account.
Section 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version